src/fst/test/gt-norm2-yamls/V-II-pimamon_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - pimamon - adsf : #  VII2on acc. Wolvengrey p. 394
  
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: pimamon
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: pimamonwa
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: pimamoniyiw
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: pimamoniyiwa

     PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [kî-pimamon]
     PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [kî-pimamonwa]
     PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [kî-pimamoniyiw]
     PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [kî-pimamoniyiwa]
     
     PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [ka-pimamon]
     PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [ka-pimamonwa]
     PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [ka-pimamoniyiw]
     PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [ka-pimamoniyiwa]
     
     PV/wî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [wî-pimamon]
     PV/wî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [wî-pimamonwa]
     PV/wî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [wî-pimamoniyiw]
     PV/wî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [wî-pimamoniyiwa]

     PV/ê+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-pimamok]
     PV/ê+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-pimamoki]
     PV/ê+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: [ê-pimamoniyik]
     PV/ê+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: [ê-pimamoniyiki]

     PV/ê+PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-kî-pimamok]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-kî-pimamoki]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: [ê-kî-pimamoniyik]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: [ê-kî-pimamoniyiki]

     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg: pimamoki
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl: pimamokwâwi
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg: pimamoniyiki
     pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl: pimamoniyikwâwi
